Texas statutes.
HUMAN RESOURCES CODE

TITLE 2. HUMAN SERVICES AND PROTECTIVE SERVICES IN GENERAL

SUBTITLE E. SERVICES FOR FAMILIES

CHAPTER 51A. NOTICE TO VICTIMS OF FAMILY VIOLENCE, STALKING, HARASSMENT, OR TERRORISTIC THREAT

Sec. 51A.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Family" has the meaning assigned by Section 71.003, Family Code.

(2) "Family violence" has the meaning assigned by Section 71.004, Family Code.

(3) "Harassment" means any conduct that constitutes an offense under Section 42.07, Penal Code.

(4) "Household" has the meaning assigned by Section 71.005, Family Code.

(5) "Member of a household" has the meaning assigned by Section 71.006, Family Code.

(6) "Stalking" means any conduct that constitutes an offense under Section 42.072, Penal Code.

(7) "Terroristic threat" means any conduct that constitutes an offense under Section 22.07, Penal Code.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 24 (S.B. 1325), Sec. 2, eff. May 13, 2023.

Sec. 51A.002. APPLICABILITY TO VICTIMS OF CERTAIN OFFENSES. This chapter applies to a victim of family violence, stalking, harassment, or terroristic threat, including:

(1) an adult member of a family or household who is subjected to an act of family violence;

(2) a member of the household of the adult described by Subdivision (1), other than the member of the household who commits the act of family violence; and

(3) a person who is subjected to conduct constituting stalking, harassment, or terroristic threat.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 24 (S.B. 1325), Sec. 2, eff. May 13, 2023.

Sec. 51A.003. NOTICE TO VICTIMS. (a) The commission by rule shall adopt a written notice to be provided to victims of family violence, stalking, harassment, or terroristic threat to assist those victims in obtaining services. The commission shall use best practices in creating the written notice.

(b) The notice adopted under this section must include the following in both English and Spanish:

(1) a statement that it is a criminal offense for any person, including a member of the family or former member of the family, to cause physical injury or harm to a victim or to engage in conduct constituting stalking, harassment, or terroristic threat toward a victim;

(2) a list of agencies and social organizations that the victim may contact for assistance with safety planning, shelter, or protection;

(3) contact information for:

(A) the National Domestic Violence Hotline;

(B) victim support services at the Department of Public Safety; and

(C) the commission's family violence program; and

(4) information regarding the legal rights of a victim, including information regarding:

(A) the filing of criminal charges and obtaining a protective order or a magistrate's order for emergency protection; and

(B) the ability of a tenant who is a victim of family violence to vacate a dwelling and terminate a residential lease.

(c) The notice adopted under this section may include any other information the commission considers useful to a victim of family violence, stalking, harassment, or terroristic threat.

(d) The commission shall periodically update the notice required under this section.

(e) The commission shall make the notice adopted under this section available on the commission's Internet website in both English and Spanish.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 24 (S.B. 1325), Sec. 2, eff. May 13, 2023.